Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.520

Processor to have grower contracts and commitments on file.

By a date or dates prescribed prior to planting time by the director, the director, in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter, may require a processor to have filed with the director:

(1) A copy of each contract the processor has entered into with a grower for the purchase of acres of crops and/or quantity of crops to be harvested during the present or next growing season; and

(2) A notice of each oral commitment the processor has given to growers for the purchase of acres of crops and/or quantity of crops to be harvested during the present or next growing season, and such notice shall disclose the amount of acres and/or quantity to which the processor has committed himself or herself.

[ 2011 c 103 s 42; 1971 ex.s. c 182 s 17.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.